src/irverb.foma
define alphabet  [a | á | b | c | d | e | é |  f | g | h | i | í | j | k | l | m | n | ñ | Ñ | o | ó | p | q | r | s | t | u | ú | ü | Ü | v | w | x | y | z];

define Con [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ñ | Ñ | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];

define word alphabet+;

read lexc eieverb.lexc
define irVerb;
define red {ar} -> 0 || _{^^^} o;
define irr e -> {ie} || ?+ _ [? - e]+ {^^^};
define Cleanup1 {^^^} -> 0 ;
regex irVerb .o. red .o. irr .o. Cleanup;
